Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 7. Claims

Cross references. —

As to limitation of actions and savings to minors or persons subject to any other legal disability, see §

1-3-114

.

§ 3-3-701.
Claims against the ward.

Claims against the ward accruing before or after the appointment of the conservator, and whether arising in contract or tort after being allowed or established as provided in W.S.

3-3-701

through

3-3-711

, shall be paid by the conservator from the assets of the conservatorship.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-702.
Filing of claim; exceptions.

All claims against the ward shall be filed in duplicate with the clerk of the court in which the conservatorship was created. If only one (1) copy of a claim is filed, the clerk shall make a duplicate and shall charge the claimant a reasonable fee.

The clerk shall forthwith transmit to the conservator one (1) copy of each claim filed.

Any claim not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200.00) may be allowed by the conservator without the filing of the claim by the creditor. The conservator is accountable to the court for paying a claim under this subsection.

Valid contract claims arising in the ordinary course of the conduct of the business or affairs of the ward by the conservator may be paid by the conservator without requiring affidavit or filing.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-703.
Affidavit and supporting documentation.

When a claim is filed with the clerk it shall be supported by satisfactory vouchers or other evidence supporting the claim, and by the affidavit of the claimant or someone in his behalf that the account is justly due, or if it is not due, when it will or may become due, that no payments have been made thereon which are not credited, and that there are no offsets to the claim to the knowledge of the affiant. If the claim is not due when filed or is contingent, an explanation of the claim shall be stated.

If the claim is founded on a bond, bill, note or other instrument, a copy of the instrument shall accompany the claim. The original instrument shall be exhibited to the conservator if demanded, unless it is lost or destroyed, in which case the claimant shall accompany his claim by his affidavit containing a copy or particular description of the instrument and stating its loss or destruction. If the claim, or any part thereof, is secured by a mortgage or other lien which has been recorded or filed in the office of the county clerk in the county in which the land or property affected by it is situate, it is sufficient to describe the mortgage or lien and refer to the date, filing number and volume and page of its record.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-704.
Claims of conservators.

If the conservator is a creditor of the ward, he shall file his claim as other creditors and the court shall appoint a competent person as temporary conservator to represent the ward in the matter allowing or disallowing the claim. The same procedure shall be followed in the case of joint conservators, where all of the conservators are creditors of the ward. If one (1) of the joint conservators is not a creditor of the ward, the disinterested conservator shall represent the ward in the matter of allowing or disallowing the claim against the estate by a conservator.

The temporary conservator shall investigate the claim and report his findings to the court and his recommendation whether the claim should be allowed or disallowed. If the court disallows the claim, it shall be treated as a rejected claim.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-705.
Claims; statutes of limitations.

The filing of a claim in the conservatorship tolls the statute of limitations applicable to the claim until the claim is rejected by the conservator.

It is within the discretion of the conservator to determine whether or not the applicable statute of limitations shall be invoked to bar a claim which he believes to be just, and his decision as to invoking the statute shall be final.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-706.
Allowance and rejection of claims.

Within sixty (60) days after the filing of a claim, the conservator shall either allow the claim in a writing filed with the clerk, or reject the claim in whole or in part in a writing filed with the clerk.

When a claim has been filed with the clerk and is rejected in whole or in part, the conservator shall, immediately upon rejection, notify the claimant by certified mail.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-707.
Action precluded until claim rejected; exception.

No holder of a claim against a ward shall maintain any action thereon unless the claim is first rejected in whole or in part by the conservator and the rejection filed with the clerk.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-708.
Compelling payment of claims.

No claimant may compel payment of his claim until it has been duly filed and allowed by the conservator or reduced to judgment and a certified copy of the judgment filed with the clerk.

Any judgment rendered upon any claim for money only establishes the claim as if it had been allowed by the conservator. The judgment shall order that the conservator pay the amount adjudged to be due, to the extent of assets available, to satisfy claims against the ward, augmented by any liability insurance proceeds available as to the claim.

If judgment is for the recovery of real or personal property or the enforcement of lien thereon, no execution shall issue until ten (10) days after a certified copy of the judgment has been filed with the clerk.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-709.
Judgments; execution and levy.

When a judgment has been entered against the ward prior to the appointment of a conservator, no execution shall issue thereon after the conservator is appointed unless the judgment is for the recovery of real or personal property or the enforcement of a lien. A judgment against the ward for the recovery of money shall be filed with the clerk as any other claim. If execution is levied upon any property of the ward before the appointment of a conservator, the property may be sold for the satisfaction of the judgment and the officer making the sale shall account to the conservator for any surplus realized from the sale.

A judgment rendered against a ward for whom a conservator is appointed after verdict or decision on an issue of fact, but before judgment is entered, shall be filed with the clerk as any other claim.

No execution shall issue upon nor any levy be made against any property of the estate of a ward under any judgment against the ward or conservator, unless the judgment is for the recovery of real or personal property or the enforcement of a lien.

This section shall not be construed to prevent the enforcement of a mortgage, pledge or other lien upon property in an appropriate proceeding.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-710.
Pending actions against the ward.

Any action, including any counterclaim in any pending action, pending against the ward at the time the conservator is appointed, shall be considered a claim filed in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

3-3-702

and

3-3-703

, if notice of substitution of the conservator as a party to the action is served on the conservator and a duplicate of proof of service of the notice of the substitution is filed with the clerk.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-711.
Payment of claims in insolvent conservatorship.

When it appears the assets of the ward are insufficient to pay in full all claims against the ward, the conservator shall report the relevant facts to the court. The court shall, upon hearing, with notice to all persons who have filed claims, order the pro rata payment of claims giving claimants the same priority, if any, as they would have if the ward were not under conservatorship. Priority of payment shall be given to court costs and other costs of administration of the conservatorship.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.